Maryland, session 2026, SB0887.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Labor and Employment
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0887*

SENATE BILL 887
SUBTITLE 7. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING FOR GREENHOUSE WORKERS.
4–701.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “CONTROLLED–ENVIRONMENT AGRICULTURAL OPERATION” MEANS AN
AGRICULTURAL OPERATION IN WHICH PLANTS ARE CULTIVATED PRIMARILY WITHIN
A GREENHOUSE OR OTHER ENCLOSED STRUCTURE WHERE TEMPERATURE AND
ENVIRONMENTAL CONDITIONS ARE ARTIFICIALLY REGULATED.
(C) “EMPLOYEE” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL EMPLOYED BY AN EMPLOYER
ENGAGED IN THE BUSINESS OF OPERATING A CONTROLLED–ENVIRONMENT
AGRICULTURAL OPERATION.
(D) “EMPLOYEE ORGANIZATION” MEANS A LABOR ORGANIZATION IN WHICH
EMPLOYEES PARTICIPATE AND THAT HAS AS ONE OF ITS PRIMARY PURPOSES
REPRESENTING EMPLOYEES.
(E) “EXCLUSIVE REPRESENTATIVE” MEANS AN EMPLOYEE ORGANIZATION
THAT HAS BEEN CERTIFIED THROUGH AN ELECTION OF EMPLOYEES TO REPRESENT
AND BARGAIN FOR THOSE EMPLOYEES OVER ANY TERMS AND CONDITIONS OF
EMPLOYMENT AUTHORIZED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
(F) (1) “SHOWING OF INTEREST FORM” MEANS A WRITTEN STATEMENT
FROM AN EMPLOYEE WHO WISHES TO BE REPRESENTED BY A PETITIONING
EMPLOYEE FOR THE PURPOSE OF COLLECTIVE BARGAINING.
(2) “SHOWING OF INTEREST FORM” INCLUDES A UNION
AUTHORIZATION CARD OR UNION MEMBERSHIP CARD.
(G) “SECRETARY” MEANS THE SECRETARY OF LABOR.
4–702.
(A) EMPLOYEES HAVE THE RIGHT TO:
(1) SELF–ORGANIZATION;
(2) FORM, JOIN, OR ASSIST AN EMPLOYEE ORGANIZATION;

SENATE BILL 887 3
(3) BARGAIN COLLECTIVELY THROUGH AN EXCLUSIVE
REPRESENTATIVE OF THEIR CHOICE;
(4) DECERTIFY AN EMPLOYEE ORGANIZATION AS THEIR EXCLUSIVE
REPRESENTATIVE;
(5) ENGAGE IN OTHER LAWFUL CONCERTED ACTIVITIES FOR THE
PURPOSE OF COLLECTIVE BARGAINING; AND
(6) REFRAIN FROM ANY ACTIVITY UNDER ITEMS (1) THROUGH (4) OF
THIS SUBSECTION.
(B) THE EMPLOYER AND THE EMPLOYEE ORGANIZATION THAT IS
CERTIFIED AS THE EXCLUSIVE REPRESENTATIVE IN ACCORDANCE WITH
REGULATIONS ADOPTED BY THE SECRETARY SHALL:
(1) MEET AT REASONABLE TIMES;
(2) ENGAGE IN COLLECTIVE BARGAINING IN GOOD FAITH;
(3) MAKE REASONABLE EFFORTS TO CONCLUDE NEGOTIATIONS WITH
A FINAL WRITTEN AGREEMENT; AND
(4) REDUCE TO WRITING ALL MATTERS AGREED ON AS A RESULT OF
NEGOTIATIONS.
(C) COLLECTIVE BARGAINING SHALL INCLUDE ALL MATTERS RELATING TO
WAGES, HOURS, AND OTHER TERMS AND CONDITIONS OF EMPLOYMENT.
(D) AN EMPLOYER MAY NOT INTERFERE WITH, INTIMIDATE, RESTRAIN, OR
COERCE AN EMPLOYEE IN THE EXERCISE OF THE EMPLOYEE’S RIGHTS UNDER THIS
SUBTITLE.
4–703.
(A) THE SECRETARY SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS
SUBTITLE, INCLUDING PROCEDURES FOR:
(1) DETERMINING APPROPRIATE BARGAINING UNITS;
(2) VERIFICATION OF SHOWING OF INTEREST FORMS;

SENATE BILL 887
(3) ELECTION OF THE EXCLUSIVE REPRESENTATIVE, INCLUDING BY
SECRET BALLOT, MAIL–IN BALLOT, OR ELECTRONIC BALLOT;
(4) CERTIFICATION OF THE EXCLUSIVE REPRESENTATIVE; AND
(5) PROCEDURES FOR RESOLVING AN IMPASSE BETWEEN THE
PARTIES.
(B) (1) THE SECRETARY MAY:
(I) INVESTIGATE AN ALLEGED VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE;
AND
(II) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, TAKE
APPROPRIATE ENFORCEMENT ACTION FOR A VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE
CONSISTENT WITH AN ENFORCEMENT ACTION ESTABLISHED BY ANY OTHER
PROVISION OF STATE LAW FOR LABOR DISPUTES INVOLVING EMPLOYEES OF
GOVERNMENTAL UNITS.
(2) IN THE EXERCISE OF THE AUTHORITY UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)(II)
OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE SECRETARY MAY NOT ASSESS A MONETARY PENALTY.
5–1201.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Heat–related illness” means a medical condition resulting from the
inability of the body to rid itself of excess heat, including heat rash, heat cramps, heat
exhaustion, heat syncope, and heat stroke.
(3) “Heat stress” means the net load to which a worker is exposed from the
combined contributions of metabolic heat, environmental factors, and clothing worn that
results in an increase in heat storage in the body, causing body temperature to rise to
sometimes dangerous levels.
(b) (1) On or before October 1, 2022, the Commissioner, in consultation with
the Maryland Occupational Safety and Health Advisory Board, shall develop and adopt
regulations that require employers to protect employees from heat–related illness caused
by heat stress.
(2) Before the Commissioner begins the process for developing and
adopting the regulations required under paragraph (1) of this subsection, Maryland
Occupational Safety and Health shall hold informational hearings in four different
geographical areas of the State for the purpose of obtaining input from interested parties.

SENATE BILL 887 5
(3) In developing the regulations required under paragraph (1) of this
subsection, the Commissioner shall consider standards created by the National Institute
for Occupational Safety and Health, the American Conference of Governmental Industrial
Hygienists, and the American National Standards Institute.
5–1202.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “CONTROLLED–ENVIRONMENT AGRICULTURAL OPERATION” HAS
THE MEANING STATED IN § 4–701 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(3) “HEAT INDEX” MEANS THE APPARENT TEMPERATURE AS
DETERMINED BY A GENERALLY ACCEPTED HEAT INDEX CHART PUBLISHED BY THE
NATIONAL WEATHER SERVICE OR A SUCCESSOR STANDARD ADOPTED BY THE
SECRETARY.
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO AN EMPLOYEE OF AN EMPLOYER WHO
OPERATES A CONTROLLED–ENVIRONMENT AGRICULTURAL OPERATION.
(C) IF A REQUIREMENT ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS SECTION AND A
REQUIREMENT ESTABLISHED BY THE COMMISSIONER IN ACCORDANCE WITH §
5–1201 OF THIS SUBTITLE CONFLICT, THE REQUIREMENT PROVIDING GREATER
PROTECTION TO AN EMPLOYEE SHALL PREVAIL TO THE EXTENT OF THE CONFLICT.
(D) EACH EMPLOYER SHALL PROVIDE EMPLOYEES WITH PAID REST BREAKS
OF NOT LESS THAN 5 MINUTES FOR EACH HOUR THAT THE HEAT INDEX INSIDE A
CONTROLLED–ENVIRONMENT AGRICULTURAL OPERATION REACHES AND
MAINTAINS AT LEAST 90 DEGREES FAHRENHEIT.
(E) A REST BREAK PROVIDED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION:
(1) SHALL BE COMPENSATED AS WORKING TIME PAID AT THE
EMPLOYEE’S REGULAR RATE OF PAY UNLESS THE BREAK COINCIDES WITH AN
OTHERWISE UNPAID MEAL PERIOD; AND
(2) MAY BE PROVIDED CONCURRENTLY WITH ANY OTHER REST
BREAK REQUIRED UNDER ANY OTHER FEDERAL OR STATE LAW.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.